Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-221
Endangered Species Act, defined.

Endangered Species Act means the Endangered Species Act of 1973, as amended, 16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 31.